Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-637
Criminal impersonation; identity theft;
identity fraud; venue; victim; contact local law enforcement agency.

For purposes
of sections 28-636 to 28-640:

(1) Notwithstanding
any other provision of law, venue for the prosecution and trial of violations
of sections 28-636 to 28-640 may be commenced and maintained in any county
in which an element of the offense occurred, including the county where a
victim resides; and

(2) If a person or entity reasonably believes that he, she, or it
has been the victim of a violation of sections 28-636 to 28-640, the victim
may contact a local law enforcement agency which has jurisdiction over the
victim's residence, place of business, or registered address. Notwithstanding
that jurisdiction may lie elsewhere for investigation and prosecution of a
crime of identity theft, the local law enforcement agency shall take the complaint
and provide the complainant with a copy of the complaint and refer the complaint
to a law enforcement agency in the appropriate jurisdiction.

Laws 2009, LB155, § 9.